Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.325

Acquisition, construction, equipping and betterment of lands, buildings and facilities at universities and The Evergreen State College—Rate of interest on obligations.

The rate or rates of interest on the principal of any obligation made or incurred under the authority granted in RCW 28B.10.300 shall be as authorized by the board of regents or trustees.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 24; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 98; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.325. Prior: 1961 c 229 s 4; prior: 1950 ex.s. c 17 s 1, part; 1947 c 64 s 1, part; 1933 ex.s. c 23 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 91 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4353-1, part. Formerly RCW 28.76.200.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.